Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1390XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1390XD (7) 91
jm/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
DIVISION I
DISCLOSURE OF TAX INFORMATION
Section 1. Section 421.19, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu
thereof the following:
2. The department may notify federal, state, or local
law enforcement agencies, and may disclose state returns,
state return information, state investigative information or
audit information, or any other state information, to such law
enforcement agencies, if the department has information that
indicates any of the following:
a. A person intentionally filed a false claim, affidavit,
return, or other information with intent to evade tax or obtain
a refund, credit, or other benefit from the department.
b. A person failed to file a return with intent to evade a
tax or filing requirement.
c. A person failed to pay with the intent to evade tax.
d. A person committed any act or omission that is a criminal
offense under a provision of this title administered by the
department.
Sec. 2. Section 421.19, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
3. Notwithstanding sections 422.20 and 422.72, the
department may disclose state returns, state return
information, state investigative or audit information, or any
other state information as provided under this section.
Sec. 3. Section 422.20, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. Unless otherwise expressly permitted by section 8G.4,
section 11.41, section 96.11, subsection 6, section 421.17,
subsections 22, 23, and 26, section 421.17, subsection 27,
paragraph “k”, section 421.17, subsection 31, section 252B.9,
section 321.40, subsection 6, sections 321.120, 421.19, 421.28,
421.59, 421.65, 422.72, and 452A.63, and 556.19, subsection 2,
this section, or another provision of law, a tax return, return
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-1- jm/jh 1/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
information, or investigative or audit information shall not
be divulged to any person or entity, other than the taxpayer,
the department, or internal revenue service for use in a matter
unrelated to tax administration.
Sec. 4. Section 422.72, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. Unless otherwise expressly permitted by section 8G.4,
section 11.41, section 96.11, subsection 6, section 421.17,
subsections 22, 23, and 26, section 421.17, subsection 27,
paragraph “k”, section 421.17, subsection 31, section 252B.9,
section 321.40, subsection 6, sections 321.120, 421.19, 421.28,
421.65, 422.20, and 452A.63, and section 556.19, subsection 2,
this section, or another provision of law, a tax return, return
information, or investigative or audit information shall not
be divulged to any person or entity, other than the taxpayer,
the department, or internal revenue service for use in a matter
unrelated to tax administration.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being
deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment.
DIVISION II
ANNUAL REPORTING
Sec. 6. Section 421.60, subsection 2, paragraph k, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 7. Section 422.75, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
422.75 Statistics —— publication.
The department shall prepare and publish an annual report
which shall include statistics reasonably available, with
respect to the operation of this chapter, including amounts
collected, classification of taxpayers, and such other facts
as are deemed pertinent and valuable. The annual report shall
also include the reports and information required pursuant to
section 421.60, subsection 2, paragraph “k”.
DIVISION III
PROPERTY TAX —— CHANGES
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-2- jm/jh 2/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 8. Section 425.20, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
3. In case of sickness, absence, or other disability of
the claimant or if, in the judgment of the director of revenue
or the director of health and human services, as applicable,
good cause exists and the claimant requests an extension, the
director of health and human services may extend the time for
filing a claim for reimbursement and the director of revenue
may extend the time for filing a claim for credit. However,
any further time granted shall not extend beyond December 31
of the year following the year in which the claim was required
to be filed. Claims filed as a result of this subsection shall
be filed with the director of health and human services or the
director of revenue, as applicable, who shall provide for the
reimbursement of the claim to the claimant.
Sec. 9. Section 445.60, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
445.60 Refunding erroneous tax.
The board of supervisors shall direct the county treasurer
to refund to the taxpayer any tax or portion of a tax found to
have been erroneously or illegally paid, with all interest,
fees, and costs actually paid. A refund shall not be ordered
or made unless a claim for refund is presented to the board
within two years of the date the tax was due, or if appealed
to the board of review, the property assessment appeal board,
director of revenue, or district court, within two years of the
final decision.
Sec. 10. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of
immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment:
The section of this division of this Act amending section
445.60.
DIVISION IV
FARM TENANCY INCOME TAX EXCLUSION
Sec. 11. Section 422.7, subsection 14, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-3- jm/jh 3/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
a. Subtract, to the extent included, net income received
by an eligible individual pursuant to a farm tenancy agreement
covering real property held by the eligible individual for
ten or more years, if the eligible individual materially
participated in a farming business for ten or more years in the
aggregate.
Sec. 12. Section 422.7, subsection 14, paragraph f, Code
2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph:
NEW SUBPARAGRAPH. (04) “Held” shall be determined with
reference to the holding period provisions of section 1223 of
the Internal Revenue Code and the federal regulations pursuant
thereto.
DIVISION V
PASS-THROUGH ENTITIES
Sec. 13. Section 422.25C, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
2. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, any
adjustments to a partnership’s or pass-through entity’s items
of income, gain, loss, expense, or credit, or an adjustment to
such items allocated to a partner that holds an interest in a
partnership or pass-through entity for the reviewed year by
the department as a result of a state partnership audit, shall
be determined at the partnership level or pass-through entity
level in the same manner as provided by section 6221(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code and the regulations thereunder unless a
different treatment is specifically provided in this title.
The provisions of sections 6222, 6223, and 6227 of the Internal
Revenue Code and the regulations thereunder shall also apply to
a partnership or pass-through entity and its direct or indirect
partners in the same manner as provided in such sections unless
a different treatment is specifically provided in this title.
For purposes of applying such sections, due account shall be
made for differences in federal and Iowa terminology. The
adjustment provided by section 6221(a) of the Internal Revenue
Code shall be determined as provided in such section but shall
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-4- jm/jh 4/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
be based on Iowa taxable income or other tax attributes of
the partnership or pass-through entity as determined pursuant
to this chapter for the reviewed year. The department shall
issue a notice of adjustment to the partnership or pass-through
entity. Such notice shall be treated as an assessment for the
purposes of section 422.25, and the notice shall be appealable,
except as provided in section 422.25, by the partnership or
pass-through entity pursuant to sections 422.28 and 422.29 and
shall be issued within the time period provided by section
422.25. Once the adjustments to partnership-related or
pass-through entity-related items or reallocations of income,
gains, losses, expenses, credits, and other attributes among
such partners for the reviewed year are finally determined,
the partnership or pass-through entity and any direct partners
or indirect partners shall then be subject to the provisions
of section 422.25, subsection 1, paragraph “e”, and section
422.25A in the same manner as if the state partnership audit
were a federal partnership level audit, and as if the final
state partnership audit adjustment were a final federal
partnership adjustment. The penalty exceptions in section
421.27, subsection 2, paragraphs “b” and “c”, shall not apply
to a state partnership audit.
Sec. 14. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being
deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment.
Sec. 15. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this
Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2024.
DIVISION VI
SALES TAX CHANGES
Sec. 16. Section 423.2, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
b. (1) Sales of building materials, supplies, and equipment
to owners, contractors, subcontractors, or builders for the
erection of buildings or the alteration, repair, or improvement
of real property are retail sales of tangible personal property
in whatever quantity sold. Where the owner, contractor,
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-5- jm/jh 5/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
subcontractor, or builder is also a retailer holding a sales
or use tax permit and transacting retail sales of building
materials, supplies, and equipment, the person shall purchase
such items of tangible personal property without liability for
the tax if such property will be subject to the tax at the
time of resale or at the time it is withdrawn from inventory
for construction purposes. The sales tax shall be due in the
reporting period when the materials, supplies, and equipment
are withdrawn from inventory for construction purposes or
when sold at retail. The tax shall not be due when materials
are withdrawn from inventory for use in construction outside
of Iowa and the tax shall not apply to tangible personal
property purchased and consumed by the manufacturer as building
materials in the performance by the manufacturer or its
subcontractor of construction outside of Iowa. The sale of
carpeting is not a sale of building materials. The sale of
carpeting to owners, contractors, subcontractors, or builders
shall be treated as the sale of ordinary tangible personal
property and subject to the tax imposed under this subsection
and the use tax Sales of building materials and supplies to
contractors, subcontractors, or builders for the erection of
buildings and other structures or for the reconstruction,
alteration, expansion, or remodeling of buildings and other
structures are retail sales of tangible personal property.
Sales of building materials and supplies to contractors,
subcontractors, or builders for use in repairs to or for
installation in existing buildings and other structures
are purchases for resale. Sales of building equipment to
contractors, subcontractors, or builders are retails sales of
tangible personal property.
(2) Where the owner, contractor, subcontractor, or builder
is also a retailer holding a sales and use tax permit and
transacting retail sales of building materials, supplies, and
equipment, the person shall purchase such items of tangible
personal property without liability for the tax if such
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-6- jm/jh 6/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
property will be subject to sales tax at the time of resale
or subject to use tax at the time the retailer withdraws
such property from inventory for use by the retailer in
erecting buildings and other structures or for reconstruction,
alteration, expansion, or remodeling of buildings and other
structures. The tax shall be due in the reporting period
when the materials, supplies, or equipment are withdrawn from
inventory or when sold at retail. The tax shall not be due when
materials and supplies are withdrawn from inventory for use in
construction outside of Iowa.
(3) The sale of carpeting is not a sale of building
materials. Sales of carpeting to owners, contractors,
subcontractors, or builders are retail sales of tangible
personal property and subject to tax.
Sec. 17. Section 423.36, subsection 9, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. Except as provided in paragraph “b”, purchasers, users,
and consumers of tangible personal property, specified digital
products, or enumerated services taxed pursuant to subchapter
II or III of this chapter or chapter 423B may be authorized,
pursuant to rules adopted by the director, to remit tax owed
directly to the department instead of the tax being collected
and paid by the seller. To qualify for a direct pay tax permit,
the purchaser, user, or consumer must accrue a tax liability of
more than four eight thousand dollars in tax under subchapters
II and III in a semimonthly monthly period and make deposits
and file returns pursuant to section 423.31. This authority
shall not be granted or exercised except upon application to
the director and then only after issuance by the director of a
direct pay tax permit.
DIVISION VII
MOTOR FUEL TAXES
Sec. 18. Section 452A.3, subsection 1, paragraph b,
unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-7- jm/jh 7/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
On and after July 1, 2030, an excise tax of thirty cents is
imposed on each gallon of ethanol blended gasoline classified
as E-15 or higher. Before July 1, 2030, the rate of the excise
tax on ethanol blended gasoline classified as E-15 or higher
shall be based on the number of gallons of ethanol blended
gasoline classified as E-15 or higher that are distributed
in this state as expressed as a percentage of the number of
gallons of motor fuel distributed in this state, which is
referred to as the distribution percentage. For purposes
of this paragraph “b”, only ethanol blended gasoline and
nonblended gasoline, not including aviation gasoline, shall be
used in determining the percentage basis for the excise tax.
The department shall determine the percentage basis for each
determination period beginning January 1 and ending December 31
based on information from reports submitted to the department
for filing pursuant to section 452A.33. Before June 1, the
department may amend the distribution percentage due to a
mistake, if there is a late report filed by a retail dealer
to the department under section 452A.33, subsection 1, or if
the distribution percentage is not accurate. The rate for the
excise tax shall apply for the period beginning July 1 and
ending June 30 following the end of the determination period.
Before July 1, 2030, the rate of the excise tax on each gallon
of ethanol blended gasoline classified as E-15 or higher shall
be as follows:
Sec. 19. Section 452A.3, subsection 3, paragraph a,
subparagraph (2), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this section and in this
subchapter, this subparagraph shall apply to the excise tax
imposed on each gallon of biodiesel blended fuel classified
as B-20 or higher used for any purpose for the privilege of
operating motor vehicles in this state. On and after July 1,
2030, the rate of the excise tax on each gallon of biodiesel
blended fuel classified as B-20 or higher is thirty-two and
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-8- jm/jh 8/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
five-tenths cents. Before July 1, 2030, the rate of the excise
tax on each gallon of biodiesel blended fuel classified as
B-20 or higher shall be based on the number of gallons of
biodiesel blended fuel classified as B-20 or higher that are
distributed in this state as expressed as a percentage of the
number of gallons of special fuel for diesel engines of motor
vehicles distributed in this state, which is referred to as
the distribution percentage. The department shall determine
the percentage basis for each determination period beginning
January 1 and ending December 31 based on information from
reports submitted to the department for filing pursuant to
section 452A.33. Before June 1, the department may amend the
distribution percentage due to a mistake, if there is a late
report filed by a retail dealer to the department under section
452A.33, subsection 1, or if the distribution percentage is
not accurate. The rate of the excise tax shall apply for the
period beginning July 1 and ending June 30 following the end of
the determination period. Before July 1, 2030, the rate of the
excise tax on each gallon of biodiesel blended fuel classified
as B-20 or higher shall be as follows:
Sec. 20. Section 452A.15, subsection 5, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
5. The director may impose a civil penalty against any
person who fails to timely file the reports or keep the records
required under this section. The penalty shall be one hundred
dollars for the first violation and shall increase by one
hundred dollars for each additional violation occurring in the
calendar year in which the first violation occurred.
Sec. 21. Section 452A.33, subsection 2, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
On or before April 1 the department shall deliver a report
to the governor and the legislative services agency. Before
June 1, the department may amend the report due to a mistake,
if there is a late report by a retail dealer under subsection
1, or if the report is not accurate. The report shall compile
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-9- jm/jh 9/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
information reported by retail dealers to the department as
provided in this section and shall at least include all of the
following:
Sec. 22. Section 452A.41, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. For the purpose of determining the amount of liability
for the electric fuel tax, each dealer and user shall file with
the department not later than July 31 for the period beginning
January 1 and ending June 30, and not later than January 30
31 for the period beginning July 1 and ending December 30 31,
a biannual tax return certified under penalties for false
certification. The return shall show, with reference to each
location at which fuel is delivered or placed by the dealer or
user into the battery or other energy storage device of any
electric motor vehicle during the next preceding six calendar
months, information as required by the department. On and
after January 1, 2026, the department may require by rule that
such tax returns be filed quarterly.
Sec. 23. Section 452A.44, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 4. If electric fuel is sold or dispensed
for a nontaxable purpose, the purchaser may complete and
provide an exemption certificate produced by the department to
the license holder.
DIVISION VIII
INHERITANCE TAX —— FUTURE CODE CHANGES DUE TO REPEAL
Sec. 24. Section 12D.9, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
3. State For a death occurring before January 1, 2025, state
inheritance tax treatment of interests in Iowa educational
savings plans shall be as provided in section 450.4, subsection
8. This subsection shall apply to all Iowa educational savings
plans existing on or after July 1, 1998.
Sec. 25. Section 12I.8, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-10- jm/jh 10/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
3. State For a death occurring before January 1, 2025, state
inheritance tax treatment of interests in Iowa ABLE savings
plans shall be as provided in section 450.4, subsection 9.
Sec. 26. Section 12I.10, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
3. State For a death occurring before January 1, 2025, state
inheritance tax treatment of interests in the qualified ABLE
program with which the state has contracted pursuant to this
section shall be as provided in section 450.4, subsection 9.
Sec. 27. Section 16.177, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
8. Bonds issued under this section are declared to be issued
for an essential public and governmental purpose and all bonds
issued under this section shall be exempt from taxation by the
state of Iowa and the interest on the bonds shall be exempt
from the state income tax and the any state inheritance tax.
Sec. 28. Section 321.47, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. The persons entitled under the laws of descent and
distribution to the possession and ownership of a vehicle owned
in whole or in part by a decedent who died intestate, upon
filing an affidavit stating the name and date of death of the
decedent, the right to possession and ownership of the persons
filing the affidavit, and that there has been no administration
of the decedent’s estate, which instrument must also contain
an agreement by the affiant to indemnify creditors of the
decedent who would be entitled to levy execution upon the motor
vehicle to the extent of the value of the motor vehicle, shall,
upon complying with the other title transfer requirements of
this chapter, be issued a registration card for the decedent’s
interest in the vehicle and a certificate of title to the
vehicle. If a decedent died testate, and either the will is
not probated or is admitted to probate without administration,
the persons entitled to the possession and ownership of
a vehicle owned in whole or in part by the decedent may
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-11- jm/jh 11/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
file an affidavit and, upon complying with the other title
transfer requirements of this chapter, shall be issued a
registration card for the decedent’s interest in the vehicle
and a certificate of title to the vehicle. The affidavit
must contain the same information and indemnity agreement
as is required in cases of intestacy under this subsection.
Chapter 450 is not For a death occurring before January 1,
2025, a requirement of chapter 450 shall not be considered
satisfied by the filing of the affidavit provided for in this
subsection. If, from the records in the office of the county
treasurer, there appear to be any liens on the vehicle, the
certificate of title must contain a statement of the liens
unless the application is accompanied by proper evidence of
the satisfaction or extinction of such liens. Evidence of
extinction includes but is not limited to an affidavit of the
applicant stating that a security interest was foreclosed as
provided in chapter 554, article 9, part 6. The department
shall waive the certificate of title fee and surcharge required
under sections 321.20, 321.20A, 321.23, 321.46, 321.52, and
321.52A if the person entitled to possession and ownership of
a vehicle, as provided in this subsection, is the surviving
spouse of a decedent.
Sec. 29. Section 331.602, subsection 23, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
23. Forward For deaths occurring before January 1, 2025,
forward to the director of revenue a copy of any deed, bill of
sale, or other transfer which shows that it is made or intended
to take effect at or after the death of the person executing
the instrument as provided in section 450.81.
Sec. 30. Section 331.756, subsection 57, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
57. Represent For deaths occurring before January 1, 2025,
represent the state in litigation relating to the inheritance
tax if requested by the department of revenue as provided in
section 450.1.
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-12- jm/jh 12/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 31. Section 421.27, subsection 1, paragraph d,
subparagraph (13), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(13) That For a death occurring before January 1, 2025,
that an Iowa inheritance tax return is filed for an estate
within the later of nine months from the date of death or sixty
days from the filing of a disclaimer by the beneficiary of the
estate refusing to take the property or right or interest in
the property.
Sec. 32. Section 421.60, subsection 2, paragraph c,
subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the notice of assessment or denial of a claim for
refund relates to a tax return filed pursuant to section
422.14, or pursuant to chapter 450 for a death occurring before
January 1, 2025, by the taxpayer which designates an individual
as an authorized representative of the taxpayer with respect to
that return, or if a power of attorney has been filed with the
department by the taxpayer which designates an individual as
an authorized representative of the taxpayer with respect to
any tax that is included in the notice of assessment or denial
of a claim for refund, a copy of the notice together with any
additional information required to be sent to the taxpayer
shall be sent to the authorized representative as well.
Sec. 33. Section 422.27, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. A final account of a personal representative, as defined
in section 450.1, shall not be allowed by any court unless the
account shows, and the judge of the court finds, that all taxes
imposed by this subchapter upon the personal representative,
which have become payable, have been paid, and that all taxes
which may become due are secured by bond or deposit, or are
otherwise secured. The certificate of acquittances of the
department of revenue is conclusive as to the payment of the
tax to the extent of the acquittance. This subsection does
not apply if all property in the estate of a decedent is
held in joint tenancy with right of survivorship by husband
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-13- jm/jh 13/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
and wife alone. For purposes of this subsection, “personal
representative” means an administrator, executor, or trustee as
each is defined in section 633.3.
Sec. 34. Section 496C.14, subsection 6, paragraph h, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
h. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section,
payment of any part of the purchase price for shares of a
deceased shareholder shall not be required until the executor
or administrator of the deceased shareholder provides
any indemnity, release, or other document from any taxing
authority, which is reasonably necessary to protect the
corporation against liability for any estate, inheritance, and
death taxes tax, or any inheritance tax for a death occurring
before January 1, 2025.
Sec. 35. Section 524.805, subsection 8, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
8. A state bank may receive deposits from one or more
persons with the provision that upon the death of the
depositors the deposit account shall be the property of the
person or persons designated by the deceased depositors as
shown on the deposit account records of the state bank. After
payment by the state bank, the proceeds shall remain subject
to the any debts of the decedent and the any payment of Iowa
inheritance tax, if any for a death occurring prior to January
1, 2025. A state bank paying the person or persons designated
shall not be liable as a result of that action for any debts
of the decedent or for any estate, inheritance, or succession
taxes which may be due this state.
Sec. 36. Section 541A.2, subsection 6, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
An individual development account closed in accordance
with this subsection is not subject to the limitations and
benefits provided by this chapter but is subject to state tax
in accordance with the provisions of section 422.7, subsection
17, and in accordance with the provisions of section 450.4,
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-14- jm/jh 14/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
subsection 6, for a death occurring before January 1, 2025. An
individual development account may be closed for any of the
following reasons:
Sec. 37. Section 602.8102, subsection 63, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
63. Carry out duties relating to the inheritance tax as
provided in chapter 450 for deaths occurring before January 1,
2025.
Sec. 38. Section 633.21, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
633.21 Appraisers’ fees and referees’ fees fixed by rule.
The district judges of each judicial district shall by rule
fix the fees of probate referees, and also provide, insofar as
practicable, a uniform schedule of compensation for inheritance
tax appraisers, other appraisers, brokers, and agents employed
at estate expense.
Sec. 39. Section 633.31, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. For services performed in short form probates
pursuant to sections 450.22 and 450.44 for deaths occurring
before January 1, 2025..................................$ 15.00
Sec. 40. Section 633.356, subsection 1, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
When the gross value of the decedent’s personal property
that would otherwise be distributed by will or intestate
succession is or has been, at any time since the decedent’s
death, fifty thousand dollars or less and there is no real
property, or for deaths occurring before January 1, 2025, the
real property passes to persons exempt from inheritance tax
as joint tenants with full rights of survivorship pursuant to
chapter 450, and if forty days have elapsed since the death of
the decedent, a successor as defined in subsection 2 may, by
furnishing an affidavit prepared pursuant to subsection 3 or
8, and without procuring letters of appointment, do any of the
following with respect to one or more items of such personal
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-15- jm/jh 15/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
property:
Sec. 41. Section 633.356, subsection 3, paragraph a,
subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(3) That the gross value of the decedent’s personal property
that would otherwise be distributed by will or intestate
succession is, or has been at any time since the decedent’s
death, fifty thousand dollars or less and there is no real
property, or for deaths occurring before January 1, 2025, the
real property passes to persons exempt from inheritance tax
as joint tenants with full rights of survivorship pursuant to
chapter 450.
Sec. 42. Section 633.356, subsection 3, paragraph a,
subparagraph (10), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(10) That no inheritance or other taxes are owed to the
department of revenue for a death occurring prior to January 1,
2025, or if taxes are owed, that the taxes will be paid to the
extent of funds received pursuant to the affidavit.
Sec. 43. Section 633.356, subsection 9, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
9. Upon receipt of an affidavit under subsection 3 and
reasonable proof under subsection 5 of the identity of each
successor seeking distribution by virtue of the affidavit,
the holder of the property shall disclose to the affiant
whether the value of the property held by the holder is, or has
been at any time since the decedent’s death, fifty thousand
dollars or less. An affidavit furnished for the purpose of
determining whether the value of the property is, or has
been at any time since the decedent’s death, fifty thousand
dollars or less need not contain the language required under
subsection 3, paragraph “a”, subparagraph (3), but shall state
that the affiant reasonably believes that the gross value
of the decedent’s personal property that would otherwise be
distributed by will or intestate succession is, or has been at
any time since the decedent’s death, fifty thousand dollars
or less and there is no real property or for deaths occurring
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-16- jm/jh 16/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
before January 1, 2025, the real property passes to persons
exempt from inheritance tax as joint tenants with full rights
of survivorship pursuant to chapter 450.
Sec. 44. Section 633.361, subsection 12, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
12. A listing of all other items, with estimated values,
which are subject to Iowa inheritance tax for deaths occurring
before January 1, 2025, or federal estate tax.
Sec. 45. Section 633.365, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
633.365 Appraisement.
Property belonging to the estate need not be appraised
unless required for inheritance tax purposes for deaths
occurring before January 1, 2025, under the provisions of this
probate code, or by order of court.
Sec. 46. Section 633.399, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
633.399 Report for approval.
After making any such sale, mortgage, exchange or lease
of real property, the personal representative shall make
a verified report thereof to the court. The court shall
examine said report, and if satisfied that the sale, mortgage,
exchange, or lease has been at a price and upon terms
advantageous to the estate, and, in all respects, made in
conformity with law, and that it ought to be confirmed, shall
confirm the same and order the personal representative to
deliver a deed, mortgage, lease or other proper instruments
to the persons entitled thereto; provided, however, that in
the event said real property has been sold at private sale
without an appraisal for inheritance tax purposes for a death
occurring before January 1, 2025, or for purpose of such sale,
or, if it has been so appraised and has been sold at private
sale for less than the appraised value thereof, then, upon the
filing of such report, the court may enter an order fixing a
time and place for hearing thereon and prescribe a notice of
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-17- jm/jh 17/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
such hearing to be served upon all interested persons, any one
of whom, prior to the time fixed for such hearing, may file
written objections to the entry of an order approving said
sale. If not satisfied that the sale, mortgage, exchange, or
lease has been made in conformity with law and that it is to the
best interests of the estate, the court may reject the sale,
mortgage, exchange, or lease, and enter such orders as the
court may deem advisable.
Sec. 47. Section 633.477, subsection 10, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
10. A statement as to whether or not all statutory
requirements pertaining to taxes have been complied with
including whether the federal estate tax due has been paid,
whether a lien continues to exist for any federal estate tax,
and whether inheritance tax was paid or a return was filed in
this state for a death occurring before January 1, 2025.
Sec. 48. Section 633.479, subsection 2, paragraph a,
subparagraph (5), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(5) Compliance with sections section 422.27, and section
450.58 for deaths occurring before January 1, 2025, have been
fulfilled.
Sec. 49. Section 633.481, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
633.481 Certificate to county recorder for tax purposes
without administration.
When an inventory or report is filed under section 450.22 for
deaths occurring before January 1, 2025, without administration
of the estate of the decedent, the heir or heir’s attorney
shall prepare and deliver to the county recorder of the county
in which the real estate is situated a certificate pertaining
to each parcel of real estate described in the inventory or
report. Any fees for certificates or recording fees required
by this section or section 633.480 shall be assessed as costs
of administration. The fees for recording and indexing the
instrument shall be as provided in section 331.604. The county
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-18- jm/jh 18/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
recorder shall deliver the certificates to the county auditor
as provided in section 558.58.
Sec. 50. Section 635.7, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. The personal representative is required to file the
report and inventory for which provision is made in section
633.361, including all probate and nonprobate assets. This
chapter does not exempt the personal representative from
complying with the requirements of section 422.27, 450.22,
450.58, 633.480, or 633.481, and the administration of an
estate whether converted to or from a small estate shall be
considered one proceeding pursuant to section 633.330. For
a death occurring before January 1, 2025, this chapter does
not exempt the personal representative from complying with the
requirements of section 450.22 or 450.58.
Sec. 51. Section 635.8, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
e. A statement that all statutory requirements pertaining to
taxes have been complied with, including whether federal estate
tax due has been paid, whether a lien continues to exist for
any federal estate tax, and whether inheritance tax was paid
or a tax return was filed in this state for a death occurring
before January 1, 2025.
Sec. 52. Section 654.16, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. If a homestead is designated, the court shall determine
the fair market value of the designated homestead before
the sheriff’s sale. The court may consult with the county
appraisers appointed pursuant to section 450.24 for deaths
occurring before January 1, 2025, or with one or more
independent appraisers, to determine the fair market value of
the designated homestead.
Sec. 53. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being
deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment.
Sec. 54. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-19- jm/jh 19/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2025, to the estates of
decedents dying on or after January 1, 2025.
DIVISION IX
LUMP SUM DISTRIBUTION OF RETIREMENT INCOME
Sec. 55. Section 422.5, subsection 7, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
7. a. In addition to the other taxes imposed by this
section, a tax is imposed, except under paragraph “b”, on the
amount of a lump sum distribution for which the taxpayer has
elected under section 402(e) of the Internal Revenue Code to
be separately taxed for federal income tax purposes for the
tax year. The rate of tax is equal to twenty-five percent of
the separate federal tax imposed on the amount of the lump
sum distribution. A nonresident is liable for this tax only
on that portion of the lump sum distribution allocable to
Iowa. The total amount of the lump sum distribution subject
to separate federal tax shall be included in net income for
purposes of determining eligibility under subsections 2 and 3,
as applicable, except the amount of the lump sum distribution
exempt from state tax in paragraph “b” shall not be included.
b. The amount of a lump sum distribution that is received
from a governmental or other pension or retirement plan,
including defined benefit or defined contribution plans,
annuities, individual retirement accounts, plans maintained or
contributed to by an employer, or maintained or contributed
to by a self-employed person as an employer, and deferred
compensation plans or any earnings attributable to the deferred
compensation plans is exempt from state tax imposed under
paragraph “a” if received by a person who is disabled, or is
fifty-five years of age or older, or is the surviving spouse of
an individual or is a survivor having an insurable interest in
an individual who would have qualified for the exemption under
this subsection for the tax year.
Sec. 56. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being
deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment.
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-20- jm/jh 20/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 57. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this
Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years
beginning on or after that date.
DIVISION X
ESTIMATED TAX THRESHOLD
Sec. 58. Section 422.16, subsection 12, paragraph a,
subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(1) Taxpayers filing a return shall make estimated tax
payments if their Iowa income tax liability can reasonably be
expected to amount to two hundred one thousand dollars or more
for the year.
Sec. 59. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes
effect January 1, 2026.
Sec. 60. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies
to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
DIVISION XI
TAX EXPENDITURE REVIEW
Sec. 61. Section 2.48, subsection 2, paragraph a,
subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department administering a tax expenditure
described in subsection 3 shall engage in a review of the tax
expenditure based upon the schedule in subsection 3, unless the
tax expenditure is repealed. For purposes of this section,
a tax expenditure is considered repealed if a zero amount
remains available to be awarded, issued, or claimed under law.
If multiple departments administer the tax expenditure, the
departments shall cooperate in the review.
Sec. 62. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph b,
subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended by striking the
subparagraph.
Sec. 63. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph d,
subparagraphs (3) and (5), Code 2025, are amended by striking
the subparagraphs.
Sec. 64. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph e,
subparagraph (4), Code 2025, is amended by striking the
LSB 1390XD (7) 91
-21- jm/jh 21/26

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
subparagraph.
Sec. 65. 2017 Iowa Acts, chapter 29, section 169, is amended
to read as follows:
SEC. 169. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following provision or
provisions in Division I of this Act take effect July 1, 2030
2039:
1. The section of this Act amending section 2.48, subsection
3, paragraph “h”.